Alaska statutes. Title 1. General Provisions.
Article 4. The Statehood Act.

Sec. 01.10.110.
Effect of amendments to Statehood Act.

No amendment (enacted after September 16, 1976) that affects an interest of the state under the Alaska Statehood Act (72 Stat. 339) is effective as to the state unless approved by law enacted by the legislature or the people of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 192 SLA 1976)